Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.090

Experience requirements.

(1) As a prerequisite to taking an examination for certification or licensure, an applicant must meet the experience requirements adopted by the director.

(2) The preexamination experience claimed by an applicant, and accepted by the department for the purpose of taking the examination, shall remain subject to postlicensure auditing by the department.

[ 1996 c 182 s 5; 1993 c 30 s 9; 1989 c 414 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.